District of Columbia statutes.
24-221.06

Exceptions.

Institutional and educational good time credits shall not be applied to the minimum terms of persons sentenced under § 22-4502, § 48-901.02, § 48-904.01, § 22-2104(b), § 22-2803, or § 22-4504(b).

History

Apr. 11, 1987, D.C. Law 6-218, § 8, 34 DCR 484
Nov. 2, 1989, D.C. Law 8-52, § 2, 36 DCR 4740
Jan. 30, 1990, D.C. Law 8-57, § 2, 36 DCR 5761
May 8, 1993, D.C. Law 9-270, § 4, 39 DCR 9223
Oct. 2, 1993, D.C. Law 10-26, § 4, 40 DCR 3416

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 24-434.